Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-271
Act, how construed.

Neither the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act nor anything contained in such act is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the authority might otherwise have under any other law of this state, and such act is cumulative to such powers. Such act does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by any other laws. The issuance of bonds under the provisions of such act need not comply with the requirements of any other state laws applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations. No proceedings, notice, or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds or any instrument or the security therefor, except as provided in such act. All projects for which funds are advanced, loaned, or otherwise provided by the authority under such act must be in compliance with any land-use, zoning, subdivision, and other laws of this state applicable to the lands upon which such project is to be constructed or located.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 71.